Louisiana, session 2026, HB694.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 18:1505.4(A)(2)(a) and (4) are hereby amended and reenacted to read
as follows:
§1505.4. Civil penalties; failure to file; timely and accurate filing; forfeiture
A.
* * *
(2)(a) The amount of such penalty may be:
Page 1 of 12
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-448 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 694
(i) One hundred Fifty dollars per day, not to exceed two thousand five
hundred one thousand two hundred fifty dollars, for each candidate for major office
and any treasurer or chairman of any committee designated as a principal campaign
committee or subsidiary committee of such a candidate.
(ii) Sixty Thirty dollars per day, not to exceed one thousand five hundred
dollars, for any candidate for district office and any treasurer or chairman of any
committee designated as a principal campaign committee or subsidiary committee
of such a candidate.
(iii) Forty Twenty dollars per day, not to exceed five hundred two hundred
fifty dollars, for any candidate for all other offices and any treasurer or chairman of
any committee designated as a principal campaign committee or subsidiary
committee of such a candidate.
(iv) Forty Twenty dollars per day, not to exceed one thousand five hundred
dollars, for any person or the treasurer or chairman of any political committee or
independent expenditure-only committee, not supporting or opposing a candidate,
but only supporting or opposing any proposition or question submitted to the voters
or any the recall of a public officer.
(v) Two One hundred dollars per day, not to exceed three one thousand five
hundred dollars, for the treasurer or chairman of any political committee or
independent expenditure-only committee supporting or opposing a candidate, other
than a candidate's principal or subsidiary campaign committee.
* * *
(4)(a) For reports required by this Chapter which are required to be filed
between the time a candidate qualifies and election day, in addition to any penalties
which may be imposed under this Section or any other law, the supervisory
committee may impose on any person required to file such a report who has not filed
such report by the sixth day after the report is due, after an adjudicatory hearing by
an adjudicatory panel of the Ethics Adjudicatory Board conducted in accordance
with the provisions of the Code of Governmental Ethics, with notice to the party who
Page 2 of 12
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-448 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 694
is the subject of the hearing, an additional civil penalty not to exceed ten five
thousand dollars.
(b) For all other reports required by this Chapter, in addition to any penalties
which may be imposed by this Section or any other law, the supervisory committee
may impose on any person required to file such a report who has not filed such report
by the eleventh day after the report is due, after an adjudicatory hearing by an
adjudicatory panel of the Ethics Adjudicatory Board conducted in accordance with
the provisions of the Code of Governmental Ethics, with notice to the party who is
the subject of the hearing, an additional civil penalty not to exceed ten five thousand
dollars.
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 24:58(D)(1) and (2) are hereby amended and reenacted to read as
follows:
§58. Enforcement
* * *
D. In addition to any other applicable penalties:
(1)(a) Any person required to register and who fails to timely register and
any person who fails to timely file any report required by this Part shall be assessed,
pursuant to R.S. 42:1157, a late fee of fifty twenty five dollars per day.
(b) However, any person who fails to timely file a lobbyist expenditure
report filed pursuant to R.S. 24:55(G) or R.S. 49:76(G) which contains all of the
information required by this Part and Part IV of Chapter 1 of Title 49 of the
Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950 shall be assessed, pursuant to R.S. 42:1157, a
late fee of fifty twenty five dollars per day.
(2) Any person whose registration or report is filed eleven or more days after
the day on which it was due may be assessed, in addition to any late fees pursuant
to this Section, after a hearing by the board, a civil penalty not to exceed one
thousand five hundred dollars.
* * *
Page 3 of 12
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-448 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 694
Section 3. R.S. 33:9668(D)(1) and (2) are hereby amended and reenacted to read as
follows:
§9668. Enforcement
* * *
D. In addition to any other applicable penalties:
(1) Any person required to register and who fails to timely register and any
person who fails to timely file any report required by this Chapter shall be assessed,
pursuant to R.S. 42:1157, a late fee of fifty twenty five dollars per day.
(2) Any person whose registration or report is filed eleven or more days after
the day on which it was due may be assessed, in addition to any late fees pursuant
to this Section, after a hearing by the board, a civil penalty not to exceed one
thousand five hundred dollars.
* * *
Section 4. R.S. 42:1114.2(G)(2), 1114.3(C)(4)(b), 1124.1(A)(2) and (B), 1124.4
(C)(1), (2), (3), and (4) and (D)(1)(b), 1153, and 1157(A)(2) and (4) are hereby amended and
reenacted to read as follows:
§1114.2. Financial disclosure; retirement systems
* * *
G.
* * *
(2) Whoever fails to file a report required by this Section, or knowingly and
willfully fails to timely file any such report, or knowingly and willfully fails to
disclose or to accurately disclose any information required by this Section shall be
assessed a civil penalty pursuant to R.S. 42:1157 for each day until such report or the
required accurate information is filed. The amount of the penalty shall be one
hundred fifty dollars per day.
* * *
§1114.3. Disaster or emergency contracts; prohibition; disclosure
* * *
Page 4 of 12
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-448 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 694
C.
* * *
(4)
* * *
(b) In addition to other applicable penalties, whoever fails to file a statement
required by this Section, or knowingly and willfully fails to timely file any such
statement, or knowingly and willfully fails to disclose or to accurately disclose any
information required by this Section shall be assessed a civil penalty in accordance
with R.S. 42:1157 for each day until such statement or the required accurate
information is filed. The amount of the penalty shall be one hundred fifty dollars per
day.
* * *
§1124.1. Penalties; required reports; failure to file; timely and accurate filing
A.
* * *
(2) The amount of such penalty shall be two hundred fifty one hundred
dollars per day for statements required by R.S. 42:1114.
B. Whoever knowingly and willfully files a false report required by this Part,
except for statements required by R.S. 42:1124, 1124.2, 1124.2.1, or 1124.3, shall
be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof shall be fined not less than
one thousand five hundred dollars nor more than ten five thousand dollars or
imprisoned in parish prison for not more than six months, or both. Any prosecution
under this Subsection shall be tried before a jury of six persons, all of whom must
concur to render a verdict.
* * *
§1124.4. Penalties
* * *
C. Penalties may be assessed as follows:
Page 5 of 12
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-448 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 694
(1) Five hundred Two hundred fifty dollars per day for financial statements
required by R.S. 42:1124.
(2) One hundred Fifty dollars per day for statements required by R.S.
42:1124.2.
(3) Fifty Twenty five dollars per day for statements required by R.S.
42:1124.2.1.
(4) Twenty-five Ten dollars per day for statements required by R.S.
42:1124.3.
* * *
D.(1)
* * *
(b)(i) Upon first conviction thereof, the person shall be fined not less than
one thousand five hundred dollars nor more than five thousand two thousand five
hundred dollars.
(ii) Upon a second or subsequent conviction for violation of the same
reporting requirement, the person shall be fined not less than one thousand five
hundred dollars nor more than ten five thousand dollars.
* * *
§1153. Penalties
A. Upon a determination that any elected official or other person has violated
any provision of any law within the jurisdiction of the Board of Ethics except
violations of the Campaign Finance Disclosure Act which shall be governed by
Chapter 11 of Title 18 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950, the Ethics
Adjudicatory Board may censure the elected official or person, or impose a fine of
not more than ten five thousand dollars, or both.
B. Upon a determination that any public employee or other person has
violated any provision of any law within the jurisdiction of the Board of Ethics
except violations of the Campaign Finance Disclosure Act which shall be governed
by Chapter 11 of Title 18 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950, the Ethics
Page 6 of 12
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-448 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 694
Adjudicatory Board may remove, suspend, or order a reduction in pay, or demotion
of the public employee or other person, or impose a fine of not more than ten five
thousand dollars, or both.
* * *
§1157. Late filing fees
A.
* * *
(2) The late filing fees for any lobbyist required to register and file reports
under the provisions of R.S. 24:50 et seq., shall be as provided in R.S. 24:58(D). The
late filing fees for any lobbyist required to register and file reports under the
provisions of R.S. 49:71 et seq., shall be as provided in R.S. 49:78(D); however, the
late filing fees applicable to a lobbyist for a lobbyist expenditure report filed
pursuant to R.S. 24:55(G) or R.S. 49:76(G) which contains all of the information
required by Part IV of Chapter 1 of Title 49 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of
1950 and all of the information required by Part III of Chapter 1 of Title 24 of the
Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950 shall be fifty twenty five dollars per day. The
late filing fees for any lobbyist required to register and file reports under the
provisions of R.S. 33:9661 et seq., shall be as provided in R.S. 33:9668(D).
* * *
(4) Any late filing fees assessed by the Board of Ethics or its staff, for any
failure to timely file any report or statement due, shall not exceed the following:
(a) If the fee is twenty-five ten dollars per day, the maximum shall be five
hundred two hundred fifty dollars.
(b) If the fee is forty twenty dollars per day, the maximum shall be one
thousand five hundred dollars.
(c) If the fee is fifty twenty five dollars per day, the maximum shall be one
thousand five hundred seven hundred fifty dollars, except that the maximum shall
be five hundred two hundred fifty dollars for fees assessed pursuant to Paragraph (2)
Page 7 of 12
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-448 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 694
of this Subsection. The computation of days provided for in this Subparagraph shall
not include Saturdays, Sundays, or other legal holidays.
(d) If the fee is sixty thirty dollars per day, the maximum shall be two one
thousand dollars.
(e) If the fee is one hundred fifty dollars per day, the maximum shall be two
thousand five hundred one thousand two hundred fifty dollars.
(f) If the fee is two one hundred dollars per day, the maximum shall be three
thousand one thousand five hundred dollars.
(g) If the fee is five hundred two hundred fifty dollars per day, the maximum
shall be twelve thousand five hundred six thousand two hundred fifty dollars.
* * *
Section 5. R.S. 49:78(D)(1) and (2) are amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§78. Enforcement
* * *
D. In addition to any other applicable penalties:
(1)(a) Any person required to register and who fails to timely register and
any person who fails to timely file any report required by this Part shall be assessed,
pursuant to R.S. 42:1157, a late fee of fifty twenty five dollars per day.
(b) However, any person who fails to timely file a lobbyist expenditure
report filed pursuant to R.S. 24:55(G) or R.S. 49:76(G) which contains all of the
information required by this Part and Part III of Chapter 1 of Title 24 of the
Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950 shall be assessed, pursuant to R.S. 42:1157, a
late fee of fifty twenty five dollars per day.
(2) Any person whose registration or report is filed eleven or more days after
the day on which it was due may be assessed, in addition to any late fees pursuant
to this Section, after a hearing by the board, a civil penalty not to exceed one
thousand five hundred dollars.
* * *
Page 8 of 12
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-448 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 694